Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.165

Additional marriage certificate form.

In addition to the application provided for in RCW 26.04.160, the county auditor for the county wherein the license is issued shall submit to each applicant at the time for application for a license the Washington state department of health marriage certificate form provided by the state registrar of vital statistics to be completed by the applicants and returned to the county auditor for the files of the state registrar of vital statistics. After the execution of the application for, and the issuance of a license, no county shall require the persons authorized to solemnize marriages to obtain any further information from the persons to be married except the names and county of residence of the persons to be married.

[ 2019 c 148 s 32; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 203; 1979 c 141 s 34; 1969 ex.s. c 279 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Rule-making authority—2019 c 148: See RCW 70.58A.901 and 70.58A.902.

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.